Nevada, session 83, AB281-82.
DO ENACT AS FOLLOWS:
Section 1. Chapter 449 of NRS is hereby amended by adding
thereto the provisions set forth as sections 2 to 22, inclusive, of this
act.
Sec. 2. As used in sections 2 to 22, inclusive, of this act,
unless the context otherwise requires, the words and terms defined
-
*AB281_R2*

– 3 –
in sections 3 to 8.7, inclusive, of this act have the meanings
ascribed to them in those sections.
Sec. 3. “Apprenticeship program” means an apprenticeship
program approved by the State Apprenticeship Council created by
NRS 610.030.
Sec. 3.1. “ASHRAE” means the American Society of
Heating, Refrigerating and Air-Conditioning Engineers.
Sec. 3.2. “Certified TAB technician” means a technician
who is certified to perform testing, adjusting and balancing of
HVAC systems by the Associated Air Balance Council, National
Environmental Balancing Bureau, Inc. or the Testing, Adjusting
and Balancing Bureau, or a similar successor organization.
Sec. 3.3. “Functional ventilation system” means a heating,
ventilation and air-conditioning system that provides the minimum
acceptable level of ventilation in accordance with the edition of
ASHRAE Standard 62.1, Ventilation and Acceptable Indoor Air
Quality most recently approved by the Board pursuant to section
9.5 of this act.
Sec. 3.4. “HVAC” means heating, ventilation and air-
conditioning.
Sec. 3.5. “Mechanical engineer” means a professional
engineer who is licensed in the discipline of mechanical
engineering by this State and who has professional experience
with heating, ventilation and air-conditioning systems.
Sec. 3.6. “MERV” means minimum efficiency reporting
value, as established by ASHRAE Standard 52.2-2017, Method of
Testing General Ventilation Air-Cleaning Devices for Removal
Efficiency by Particle Size.
Sec. 4. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 5. “Qualified adjusting personnel” means either of the
following:
1. A certified TAB technician; or
2. A skilled and trained workforce under the supervision of a
certified TAB technician.
Sec. 6. “Qualified testing personnel” means either of the
following:
1. A certified TAB technician; or
2. A person certified to perform assessments of heating,
ventilation and air-conditioning systems by a certifying body in
accordance with the edition of standard ISO/IEC 17024,
Conformity assessment -- General requirements for bodies
operating certification of persons, of the International
Organization for Standardization most recently approved by the
Board pursuant to section 9.5 of this act.
-
*AB281_R2*

– 4 –
Sec. 7. “Senior living facility” means any facility that
receives any federal funding from Medicare, Medicaid or other
federal health care program and which provides living assistance
and related care to a resident of the facility who is an aged or
infirm person including, without limitation, a facility for
intermediate care, facility for skilled nursing, residential facility
for groups or home for individual residential care.
Sec. 8. “Skilled and trained workforce” means a workforce
not less than 60 percent of which is composed of graduates of an
apprenticeship program for the applicable occupation.
Sec. 8.3. “Ventilation verification assessment” means an
assessment to determine the status of a ventilation system
performed in accordance with section 14 of this act.
Sec. 8.7. “Zone” means an area of a senior living facility
where the temperature is controlled by one thermostat.
Sec. 9. The Legislature finds and declares that:
1. Studies have found:
(a) Most ventilation systems are improperly installed; and
(b) Many of the problems with ventilation systems are linked to
the use of inadequately trained personnel to install, test, adjust
and balance ventilation systems.
2. Ventilation systems should operate as efficiently as
possible and inspections and repairs should be performed by
qualified personnel.
3. In addition to increasing the risk of infectious, airborne
diseases, inadequate ventilation systems in senior living facilities
negatively impact the health of residents and staff in senior living
facilities.
4. Improving indoor air quality in senior living facilities may
protect the health of residents and staff, reduce the risk of
infectious, airborne diseases and save energy.
5. Senior living facilities should have functioning ventilation
systems that meet or exceed recommended health and safety
standards.
6. Consistent statewide standards for senior living facilities
are necessary to protect the health and safety of residents and
staff.
Sec. 9.2. The provisions of sections 2 to 22, inclusive, of this
act apply only to senior living facilities located in a county whose
population is 100,000 or more.
Sec. 9.5. The Board shall review the editions of ASHRAE
Standard 62.1, Ventilation and Acceptable Indoor Air Quality,
Standard ISO/IEC 17024, Conformity assessment -- General
requirements for bodies operating certification of persons, of the
International Organization for Standardization, and the Uniform
-
*AB281_R2*

– 5 –
Mechanical Code of the International Association of Plumbing
and Mechanical Officials in effect on the effective date of this act
to ensure the suitability of the new edition for this State. Each new
edition of those standards shall be deemed approved by the Board
unless the edition is disapproved by the Board within 60 days after
the date of publication of the new edition.
Sec. 10. 1. To the extent that money is available, the
administrator of a senior living facility shall ensure that the senior
living facility is equipped with a functional ventilation system that
is tested, adjusted and, if necessary or cost-effective, repaired,
upgraded or replaced to increase efficiency and performance in
accordance with the provisions of sections 2 to 22, inclusive, of
this act. Money shall be considered available if the senior living
facility:
(a) Receives federal or state money and allocates such money
to equip the senior living facility with a functional ventilation
system or improve the ventilation system or indoor air quality in
the senior living facility; or
(b) As a condition of receiving federal or state money is
required to ensure the senior living facility is equipped with a
functional ventilation system or improve the ventilation system or
indoor air quality in the senior living facility.
2. Not later than July 1, 2025, and at least once every 5 years
thereafter, the administrator of a senior living facility or any other
person that ensures a senior living facility is equipped with a
functional ventilation system pursuant to this section shall employ
qualified adjusting personnel or qualified testing personnel, or
cause such persons to be contracted, to perform a ventilation
verification assessment in accordance with section 14.5 of this act
to determine the status of and make any necessary improvements
to the heating, ventilation and air-conditioning system of the
senior living facility.
3. A senior living facility that is an assisted living facility
certified by the Housing Division of the Department of Business
and Industry pursuant to NRS 319.147 may use federal money
received pursuant to paragraph (a) of subsection 1 to upgrade and
maintain the ventilation system of that facility.
Sec. 11. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 12. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 13. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 14. 1. Except as otherwise provided in subsection 2,
each zone in a senior living facility must be equipped with a
carbon dioxide monitor and at least one carbon dioxide monitor
for each 10,000 square feet of floor space. Such a carbon dioxide
monitor must:
-
*AB281_R2*

– 6 –
(a) Be hardwired, plugged in or battery-operated and mounted
to the wall at least 3 feet but not more than 6 feet above the floor
and at least 5 feet away from any door or operable window;
(b) Display readings of the concentration of carbon dioxide to
appropriate personnel through a display on the monitor or
through an application on an Internet website or a cellular
telephone;
(c) Provide a visual notification, including, without limitation,
through an indicator light, electronic mail, text message or an
application on a cellular telephone, when the concentration of
carbon dioxide in the room reaches 1,100 parts per million or
more;
(d) Maintain a record of previous data that includes, without
limitation, the maximum carbon dioxide concentration measured;
(e) Have a range of 400 parts per million to 5,000 parts per
million or more; and
(f) Be certified by the manufacturer of the carbon dioxide
monitor to:
(1) Be accurate within 75 parts per million at a carbon
dioxide concentration of 1,000 parts per million; and
(2) Require calibration not more than once every 5 years.
2. The technical specifications for carbon dioxide monitors
set forth in subsection 1 may be amended by regulation of the
Board as necessary to reflect available technology and to achieve
the intent of that subsection.
3. If appropriate personnel observe a concentration of carbon
dioxide exceeding 1,100 parts per million more than once in any
7-day period in any zone, the administrator of the senior living
facility shall cause qualified adjusting personnel to adjust the
ventilation of the zone as necessary to ensure that the
concentration of carbon dioxide in the zone remains below 1,100
parts per million.
Sec. 14.5. 1. In a ventilation verification assessment of a
senior living facility performed pursuant to section 10 of this act,
qualified testing personnel must:
(a) Record information from HVAC equipment and the motor
nameplate.
(b) Conduct such testing as necessary to determine that filters
are performing at maximum efficiency.
(c) Obtain physical measurements of the outside air rates at
minimum and maximum load conditions.
(d) For each zone, estimate the number of occupants and
determine the current occupancy categories, as listed in Table
402.1 of ASHRAE Standard 62.1-2022, Ventilation and
Acceptable Indoor Air Quality.
-
*AB281_R2*

– 7 –
(e) Verify the operation of components of the ventilation
system.
(f) Measure all inlets and outlets for air distribution.
(g) Verify the proper operation of each unit of the HVAC
system.
(h) Verify that maintenance has been performed in accordance
with section 8 and table 8.1 of ASHRAE Standard 62.1-2022,
Ventilation and Acceptable Indoor Air Quality.
(i) Verify that control sequences are organized in a manner
that facilitates proper operation of the HVAC system.
(j) Verify the installation of carbon dioxide monitors as
required by section 14 of this act and the accuracy of all carbon
dioxide monitors within 75 parts per million at a carbon dioxide
concentration of 1,000 parts per million.
(k) If the facility is not currently equipped with mechanical
ventilation, collect field data to determine the feasibility of
installing such ventilation.
(l) Identify such adjustments, repairs, upgrades or
replacements described in section 19 of this act as are necessary to
meet:
(1) The minimum requirements concerning ventilation and
filtration prescribed by any applicable local building code; and
(2) The criteria of the edition of ASHRAE Standard 62.1,
Ventilation and Acceptable Indoor Air Quality, most recently
approved by the Board pursuant to section 9.5 of this act.
(m) Document the performance of each task performed
pursuant to paragraphs (a) to (l), inclusive.
2. Based on the documentation described in paragraph (m) of
subsection 1, the qualified testing personnel who perform a
ventilation verification assessment pursuant to section 10 of this
act must prepare an HVAC assessment report and provide the
report to a mechanical engineer for review in accordance with
section 18 of this act.
Sec. 15. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 16. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 17. (Deleted by amendment.)
Sec. 18. The mechanical engineer who reviews an HVAC
assessment report pursuant to subsection 2 of section 14.5 of this
act must:
1. Verify or adjust the estimated minimum outside air
ventilation rates.
2. Determine what, if any, additional adjustments, repairs,
upgrades or replacements described in section 19 of this act are
necessary to meet:
-
*AB281_R2*

– 8 –
(a) The minimum ventilation and filtration requirements of the
local building code; and
(b) The criteria of the edition of ASHRAE Standard 62.1,
Ventilation and Acceptable Indoor Air Quality most recently
approved by the Board pursuant to section 9.5 of this act.
3. Provide the senior living facility with an estimate of costs
for all recommended work.
Sec. 19. 1. A senior living facility shall take any corrective
actions:
(a) Identified in an HVAC assessment report created pursuant
to subsection 2 of section 14.5 of this act and reviewed by a
mechanical engineer pursuant to section 18 of this act; or
(b) Identified by a mechanical engineer pursuant to section 18
of this act.
2. Corrective actions identified in an HVAC assessment
report or by a mechanical engineer must include, where
necessary:
(a) Testing, adjusting and balancing the mechanical
ventilation system of the senior living facility, if any; and
(b) If necessary or cost effective, repairs, upgrades or
replacement of the HVAC system or installation of a stand-alone
mechanical ventilation system.
3. Corrective actions identified in an HVAC assessment
report or by a mechanical engineer may additionally include,
without limitation:
(a) General maintenance.
(b) Reading and adjustment of ventilation rates.
(c) Replacement of filters to meet a MERV of at least 13 if
equipment allows, while ensuring that the pressure drop is less
than the capability of the fan.
(d) Direct outside airflow intake measurement.
4. A senior living facility may only use portable filtration and
air cleaners:
(a) If the infrastructure of the existing HVAC system is not
able to meet the requirements for filtration and ventilation
prescribed by sections 2 to 22, inclusive, of this act.
(b) As recommended by a mechanical engineer as a
supplemental enhancement to the permanent infrastructure of the
HVAC system:
(1) When the desired indoor air quality cannot be
maintained with the mechanical ventilation system; or
(2) There exist concerns relating to outdoor air
contaminants such as those created by wildfires and air pollution.
5. All adjustments to an HVAC system at a senior living
facility must be performed by qualified adjusting personnel.
-
*AB281_R2*

– 9 –
Sec. 20. 1. The administrator of a senior living facility
shall ensure that all work required by section 19 of this act
including, without limitation, repairs, upgrades and replacements
of an HVAC system, is performed by a skilled and trained
workforce of the construction industry and in compliance with
applicable regulations of the Board.
2. The Division and the Board shall work in consultation
with the Labor Commissioner, as necessary, to ensure that
assessments and construction required pursuant to sections 2 to
22, inclusive, of this act satisfy any applicable standards and
requirements of the edition of the Uniform Mechanical Code of
the International Association of Plumbing and Mechanical
Officials, most recently approved by the Board pursuant to section
9.5 of this act.
Sec. 21. Upon the completion of work required by section 19
of this act, the administrator of a senior living facility shall submit
a report to the Division. The report must include:
1. The name and address of:
(a) The senior living facility;
(b) The person preparing and certifying the report; and
(c) The qualified testing personnel, qualified adjusting
personnel, mechanical engineers, contractors and the members of
the skilled and trained workforce of the construction industry who
performed assessments, adjustments or construction relating to the
work.
2. Copies of the certification and license, if applicable, of
each person identified in paragraph (c) of subsection 1.
3. A copy of all procurement documents relating to the work.
4. Documentation of:
(a) Verifications of initial operating ventilation rates.
(b) Adjustments, repairs, upgrades and replacements
performed pursuant to section 19 of this act.
(c) The final operating conditions of the HVAC system,
including, without limitation, the MERV of the filtration system
and verified ventilation and exhaust rates for classrooms,
auditoriums, gymnasiums, restrooms, offices and other occupied
spaces.
(d) Verification that all work has been tested by qualified
testing personnel and adjusted by qualified adjusting personnel.
(e) Verification that all repairs, upgrades and replacements
were performed by a contractor who uses a skilled and trained
workforce of the construction industry and who is in compliance
with any applicable standards of the United States Department of
Labor.
-
*AB281_R2*

– 10 –
(f) Compliance with section 19 of this act, including, without
limitation, the make and model of each carbon dioxide monitor
installed in the senior living facility.
Sec. 22. An HVAC assessment report created pursuant to
section 14.5 of this act and reviewed by a mechanical engineer
pursuant to section 18 of this act and a report submitted to the
Division by the administrator of a senior living facility pursuant to
section 21 of this act are public records and are available for
public inspection.
Sec. 22.5. 1. The Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services
shall regularly monitor the amount of federal money available to
facilitate the compliance of senior living facilities with the
provisions of sections 2 to 22, inclusive, of this act. On the date on
which the Administrator determines that there is insufficient federal
money available for that purpose, the Administrator shall transmit
notice of that determination to the Governor and the Director of the
Legislative Counsel Bureau.
2. As used in this section, “senior living facility” has the
meaning ascribed to it in section 7 of this act.
Sec. 23. This act becomes effective upon passage and
approval, and expires by limitation on the date on which the
Director of the Legislative Counsel Bureau receives notice of a
determination by the Administrator of the Division of Public and
Behavioral Health of the Department of Health and Human Services
pursuant to section 22.5 of this act that there is insufficient federal
money available to facilitate the compliance of senior living
facilities with the provisions of sections 2 to 22, inclusive, of this
act.
H
-
*AB281_R2*